Washington statutes.
RCW 13.50.200

Records of motor vehicle operation violation forwarded.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, whenever a child is arrested for a violation of any law, including municipal ordinances, regulating the operation of vehicles on the public highways, a copy of the traffic citation and a record of the action taken by the court shall be forwarded by the juvenile court to the department of licensing in the same manner as provided in RCW 46.20.270.

[ 1979 c 155 s 13; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 14. Formerly RCW 13.04.278.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.